Hawaii, session 2026, GM1220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the university of
Hawaii system is experiencing sustained enrollment declines,
demographic shifts, workforce shortages, and increasing fiscal
pressures and this is a matter of statewide concern pursuant to
article X, section 6, of the Hawaii State Constitution, that
requires careful stewardship of public higher education
resources.
The legislature further finds that informed institutional
planning and rightsizing require transparent, consistent, and
comparable data on academic programs, including student demand,
completion, cost, and post-graduation outcomes. While the
university of Hawaii conducts internal program reviews, the
availability and consistency of program-level data across
campuses varies and is not readily accessible to students,
policymakers, or the public.
The legislature also finds that students and their families
increasingly require clear, accessible, and comparable
2026-3339 HB2158 GDI HMSO

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
information to make informed decisions regarding educational
pathways, including the total cost of attendance, time to
completion, and expected post-graduation outcomes.
The purpose of this Act is to improve transparency and data
availability primarily to support students and their families in
making informed decisions regarding educational pathways and
outcomes, while also supporting evidence-based institutional
planning, program review, and rightsizing of the university of
Hawaii system, and respecting the constitutional authority of
the board of regents over internal structure, management, and
operation of the university.
SECTION 2. Chapter 304A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I, subpart A, to be
appropriately designated and to read as follows:
"§304A- Program level transparency; dashboard; reports.
(a) The university of Hawaii shall develop a systemwide data
inventory and implementation plan for a publicly accessible
online dashboard intended primarily to provide students and
their families with clear, comparable, and actionable
information regarding academic programs, including cost, time to
completion, and post-completion outcomes.
2026-3339 HB2158 CDl HMSO

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(b) No later than December 1^ 2026, the university of
Hawaii shall submit to the legislature a preliminary report that
includes;
(1) A comprehensive inventory of existing data elements
available across all campuses;
(2) Identification of gaps in data collection and data
infrastructure;
(3) Standardized definitions for key data elements;
(4) A phased implementation roadmap for the development of
the dashboard, including timelines, methodologies, and
priorities; and
(5) A proposed list of data elements to be included in the
dashboard.
(c) Based on the implementation roadmap developed pursuant
to subsection (b), the university of Hawaii shall develop,
implement, and maintain a publicly accessible, systemwide online
dashboard. The dashboard shall be designed with students and
their families as the primary audience and shall prioritize
clarity, usability, and relevance to decision-making.
2026-3339 HB2158 CDl HMSO


Page 4 H.B. NO. ""
C.D. 1
(d) The dashboard shall include data elements as
determined by the university of Hawaii pursuant to subsection
(b)(5)z which may include:
(1) Total cost of attendance over time;
(2) Median time to degree or completion;
(3) Student retention and completion rates;
(4) Post-completion outcomes^ including employment status,
median earnings, and enrollment in further education;
a^
(5) Any other information deemed relevant to student
decision-making.
(e) The university of Hawaii may include additional
program-level data elements to support institutional planning
and policymaking purposes, including but not limited to cost,
capacity, and instructional metrics; provided that the inclusion
of such information does not detract from the primary student­
facing purpose of the dashboard.
(f) All data reported pursuant to this section shall be
presented in a manner that protects student privacy and complies
with applicable state and federal laws.
2026-3339 HB2158 GDI HMSO

miNiniiinniiiiiiiiiiin

Page 5
H.B. NO. H^j
C.D. 1
(g) No later than December 2027, and annually
thereafter, the university of Hawaii shall submit a report to
the legislature that includes;
(1) Progress on the implementation and operation of the
dashboard;
(2) Any updates to data definitions or methodologies;
(3) Systemwide trends in enrollment, completion, and post­
completion outcomes; and
(4) How data is being used to inform institutional
planning and decision-making, including but not
limited to decisions to continue, redesign,
consolidate, suspend, or terminate academic programs.
(h) The university of Hawaii shall submit a supplementary
report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the
convening of the Regular Session of 2031. The supplementary
report shall include findings assessing the relevance,
effectiveness, and alignment of the dashboard with its intended
purpose, as well as any proposed legislation.
(i) The university of Hawaii shall incorporate the data
developed pursuant to this section into the board of regents'
2026-3339 HB2158 CDl HMSO

■■■iiiiiiniiiiiiii

Page 6
H.B. NO. S
C.D. 1
existing academic program review, planning, and prioritization
processes. '*
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
provided that this Act shall be repealed on June 30, 2031.
2026-3339 HB2158 CDl HMSO


H.B. NO. S?i
C.D. 1
APPROVED this Sth day of June ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2158,HD1,SD1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2158, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
resident of the^naie
Clerk of the Senate
116-26